California statutes. Education Code
(x) “Support services” means those services that, when combined with preschool services, help promote the healthy physical, mental, social, and emotional growth of children. Support services may include, but are not limited to: protective services, parent training, provider and staff training, transportation, parent and child counseling, child development resource and referral services, and child placement counseling.

(y) “Teacher” means a person with the appropriate permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing who provides program supervision and instruction that includes supervision of a number of aides, volunteers, and groups of children.

(z) “Underserved area” means a county or subcounty area, including, but not limited to, school districts, census tracts, or ZIP Code areas, where the ratio of publicly subsidized preschool program services to the need for these services is low, as determined by the Superintendent.

(aa) “Three-year-old children” means children who will have their third birthday on or before December 1 of the fiscal year in which they are enrolled in a California state preschool program. Children who have their third birthday on or after December 2 of the fiscal year, may be enrolled in a California
 state preschool program on or after their third birthday. Any child under four years of age shall be served in a California state preschool program facility, licensed in accordance with Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ab) “Two-year-old children” means children who have had their second birthday and do not otherwise meet the definition of “three-year-old children.”

(ac) “Four-year-old children” means children who will have their fourth birthday on or before December 1 of the fiscal year in which they are enrolled in a California state preschool program, or a child whose fifth birthday occurs after September 1 of the fiscal year in which they are enrolled in a California state preschool and whose parent or guardian has opted to retain or enroll them in a California state preschool program.

(ad) “Homeless children and youth” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11434a(2) of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.).

(ae) “Local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a community college district, or a school district acting on behalf of one or more schools within the school district.

(af) “Funded enrollment” means the number of subsidized children funded to be enrolled, based on the maximum reimbursable amount, contract rate, inclusive of any adjustment factors, and approved program calendar, by a California state preschool program contractor.

(ag) (1) Effective no later than March 1, 2024, “part-time” means preschool services certified for a child for fewer than 25 hours per week.

(2) Effective no later than March 1, 2024, “full-time” means preschool services certified for a child for 25 or more hours per week.

(3) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement this subdivision, the department may implement this subdivision through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before December 31, 2023.

(4) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to adopt regulations to implement this subdivision no later than July 1, 2026.

(5) If the provisions of this subdivision are in conflict with
 the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(ah) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

8205.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Applicant or contracting agency” means a school district, community college district, college or university, county superintendent of schools, county, city, public agency, private nontax-exempt agency, private tax-exempt agency, or other entity that is authorized to establish, maintain, or operate services pursuant to this chapter. Private agencies and parent cooperatives, duly licensed by law, shall receive the same consideration as any other authorized entity with no loss of parental decisionmaking prerogatives as consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) “Assigned reimbursement rate” is that rate established by the contract with the agency in accordance with Section 8242.

(c) “Attendance” means the number of children present at a preschool facility. “Attendance,” for purposes of reimbursement, includes excused absences by children because of illness, quarantine, illness or quarantine of their parent, family emergency, medical and educational appointments, or to spend time with a parent or other relative as required by a court of law or that is clearly in the best interest of the child. For purposes of reimbursement, a California state preschool program contractor may claim attendance for days that the child is not in attendance during an appeal process and not in attendance pursuant to Section 8489.1.

(d) “Capital outlay” means the amount paid for the renovation and repair of childcare and development and preschool facilities to comply with
 state and local health and safety standards, and the amount paid for the state purchase of relocatable childcare and development and preschool facilities for lease to qualifying contracting agencies.

(e) “Preschool facility” means a residence or building or part thereof in which preschool services are provided.

(f) “Early childhood programs” means those programs that offer a full range of services for children from infancy to 13 years of age, for any part of a day, by a public, private, or proprietary agency, in centers and family childcare homes.

(g) “Children at risk of abuse, neglect, or exploitation” means children who are so identified in a written referral from a legal, medical, or social service agency, or emergency shelter.

(h) “Children with
 exceptional needs” means either of the following:

(1) Children under three years of age who have been determined to be eligible for early intervention services pursuant to the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code) and its implementing regulations. These children include an infant or toddler with a developmental delay or established risk condition, or who is at high risk of having a substantial developmental disability, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 95014 of the Government Code. These children shall have active individualized family service plans and shall be receiving early intervention services.

(2) Children 3 to 21 years of age, inclusive, who have been determined to be eligible for special education and related services by an individualized education program team according to the special education
 requirements contained in Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 4 of Title 2, and who meet eligibility criteria described in Section 56026 and, Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 56333) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2, and Sections 3030 and 3031 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. These children shall have an active individualized education program and shall be receiving early intervention services or appropriate special education.

(i) “Cost” includes, but is not limited to, expenditures that are related to the operation of preschool programs. “Cost” may include a reasonable amount for state and local contributions to employee benefits, including approved retirement programs, agency administration, and any other reasonable program operational costs. “Cost” may also include amounts for licensable facilities in the community served by the program, including lease payments or depreciation,
 downpayments, and payments of principal and interest on loans incurred to acquire, rehabilitate, or construct licensable facilities, but these costs shall not exceed fair market rents existing in the community in which the facility is located. “Reasonable and necessary costs” are costs that, in nature and amount, do not exceed what an ordinary prudent person would incur in the conduct of a competitive business.

(j) “Elementary school,” as contained in former Section 425 of Title 20 of the United States Code (the National Defense Education Act of 1958, Public Law 85-864, as amended), includes early childhood education programs and all child development programs, for the purpose of the cancellation provisions of loans to students in institutions of higher learning.

(k) “Family childcare home education network” means an entity organized under law that contracts with the department to
 make payments to licensed family childcare home providers and to provide educational and support services to those providers and to children and families eligible for California state preschool program services.

(l) “Health services” include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Referral, whenever possible, to appropriate health care providers able to provide continuity of medical care.

(2) Health screening and health treatment, including a full range of immunization recorded on the appropriate state immunization form to the extent provided by the Medi-Cal Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and the Child Health and Disability Prevention Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division
 106 of the Health and Safety Code), but only to the extent that ongoing care cannot be obtained utilizing community resources.

(3) Health education and training for children, parents, staff, and providers.

(4) Followup treatment through referral to appropriate health care agencies or individual health care professionals.

(m) “Higher educational institutions” means the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and the governing bodies of any accredited private nonprofit institution of postsecondary education.

(n) “Intergenerational staff” means persons of various generations.

(o) “Dual language learner children” means children whose first language is a language other than English or children who are developing two or more languages, one of which may be English.

(p) “Parent” means a biological parent, stepparent, adoptive parent, foster parent, caretaker relative, or any other adult living with a child who has responsibility for the care and welfare of the child.

(q) “Program director” means a person who, pursuant to Section 8298, is qualified to serve as a program director.

(r) “Proprietary agency” means an organization or facility providing preschool, which is operated for profit.

(s) “Children with severe disabilities” are children with exceptional needs from birth to 21 years of age, inclusive, who require
 intensive instruction and training in programs serving pupils with the following profound disabilities: autism, blindness, deafness, severe orthopedic impairments, serious emotional disturbances, or severe intellectual disabilities. “Children with severe disabilities” also include those individuals who would have been eligible for enrollment in a developmental center for handicapped pupils under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 56800) of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 as it read on January 1, 1980.

(t) (1) “Site supervisor” means a person who, regardless of their title, has operational program responsibility for an early childhood program at a single site.

(2) A site supervisor shall satisfy one of the following:

(A) Hold a permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that
 authorizes supervision of a childcare and development program operating in a single site.

(B) Hold an administrative credential or an administrative services credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(C) Meet the qualifications of a program director under Section 8298.

(3) The Superintendent may waive the requirements of this subdivision if the Superintendent determines that the existence of compelling need is appropriately documented.

(u) “Standard reimbursement rate” means the reimbursement rate applicable to California state preschool programs pursuant to Section 8242.

(v) “Startup costs” means those expenses an agency incurs in the process of opening a new or
 additional facility before the full enrollment of children.

(w) “California state preschool program” means those programs that offer part-day or full-day, or both, educational programs for eligible three- and four-year-old children. These programs may be offered by a public, private, or proprietary agency, and operated in childcare centers or family childcare homes operating through a family childcare home education network.

(x) “Support services” means those services that, when combined with preschool services, help promote the healthy physical, mental, social, and emotional growth of children. Support services may include, but are not limited to: protective services, parent training, provider and staff training, transportation, parent and child counseling, child development resource and referral services, and child placement counseling.

(y) “Teacher” means a person with the appropriate permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing who provides program supervision and instruction that includes supervision of a number of aides, volunteers, and groups of children.

(z) “Underserved area” means a county or subcounty area, including, but not limited to, school districts, census tracts, or ZIP Code areas, where the ratio of publicly subsidized preschool program services to the need for these services is low, as determined by the Superintendent.

(aa) “Three-year-old children” means children who will have their third birthday on or before December 1 of the fiscal year in which they are enrolled in a California state preschool program. Children who have their third birthday on or after December 2 of the fiscal year, may be enrolled in a California state
 preschool program on or after their third birthday. Any child under four years of age shall be served in a California state preschool program facility, licensed in accordance with Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ab) “Four-year-old children” means children who will have their fourth birthday on or before December 1 of the fiscal year in which they are enrolled in a California state preschool program, or a child whose fifth birthday occurs after September 1 of the fiscal year in which they are enrolled in a California state preschool and whose parent or guardian has opted to retain or enroll them in a California state preschool program.

(ac) “Homeless children and youth” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11434a(2) of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.).

(ad) “Local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a community college district, or a school district acting on behalf of one or more schools within the school district.

(ae) “Funded enrollment” means the number of subsidized children funded to be enrolled, based on the maximum reimbursable amount, contract rate, inclusive of any adjustment factors, and approved program calendar, by a California state preschool program contractor.

(af) (1) Effective no later than March 1, 2024, “part-time” means preschool services certified for a child for fewer than 25 hours per week.

(2) Effective no later than March 1, 2024, “full-time” means preschool services certified for a child for 25 or more hours per week.

(3) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement this subdivision, the department may implement this subdivision through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before December 31, 2023.

(4) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to adopt regulations to implement this subdivision no later than July 1, 2026.

(5) If the provisions of this subdivision are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative
 action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(ag) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8206.

(a) If a state of emergency is declared by the Governor, the Superintendent may waive any requirements of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code relating to preschool programs operated pursuant to this chapter only to the extent that enforcement of the regulations or requirements would directly impede disaster relief and recovery efforts or would disrupt the current level of service in
 preschool programs.

(b) A waiver granted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not exceed 45 calendar days.

(c) For purposes of this section, “state of emergency” includes, but is not limited to, fire, flood, earthquake, or a period of civil unrest.

(d) If a request for a waiver pursuant to subdivision (a) is
 for a childcare and development
 program, preschool program, or child nutrition program that receives federal funds and the waiver may be inconsistent with the state plan or any federal law or regulations governing the program, the Superintendent shall seek and obtain approval of the waiver from the appropriate federal agency before granting the waiver.

(e) (1) From July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, inclusive, due to the ongoing impacts of childcare and development facility closures and low child attendance due to the COVID-19 pandemic
 and related public health directives, the Superintendent shall reimburse a contracting agency for a California state preschool program pursuant to former Article 7 (commencing with Section 8235), a general childcare and development program pursuant to former Article 8 (commencing with Section 8240), a family childcare home education network pursuant to former Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 8245), a migrant childcare and development program pursuant to former Article 6 (commencing with Section 8230), or childcare and development services for children with special needs pursuant
 to
 former Article 9 (commencing with Section 8250) that meets one of the following requirements:

(A) The program operated by the contracting agency opens by September 8, 2020, or within 21 calendar days from the start date of the contracting agency’s 2020–21 program calendar approved by the department, whichever is sooner, and remains open and offering services through the 2020–21 program year.

(B) The program operated by the contracting agency is closed by local or state public health order or guidance due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(C) (i) The program operates on the campus of a local educational agency that is closed by local or state public health guidance or order and the local educational agency has required the early learning and care program to
 close.

(ii) To ensure continuity of care and access to services during the COVID-19 pandemic, the governing board or body of the local educational agency requiring a closure pursuant to clause (i) shall discuss in a public hearing and prepare a plan for safely reopening early learning and care programs as soon as safely possible, but no later than when local education agency campuses open for in-person instruction.

(2) Reimbursement pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be 100 percent of the contract maximum reimbursable amount or net reimbursable program costs, whichever is less, pursuant to guidance released by the Superintendent.

(3) A childcare program specified in paragraph (1) that is physically closed pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) due to the COVID-19 pandemic, but funded to be operational,
 shall provide distance learning services as specified by the Superintendent. A contractor specified in paragraph (1) shall submit a distance learning plan to the department pursuant to guidance from the Superintendent.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8209 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 21.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Administration [8207. - 8225.]

8207.

(a) The Superintendent shall administer all California state preschool programs. Those programs shall include, but not be limited to, part-day and full-day age and developmentally appropriate programs, offered through childcare centers and family childcare home education networks, that are designed to facilitate the transition to kindergarten for two-, three-, and four-year-old children and that provide early learning and care, health services, social services, nutritional services, parent education and parent participation, evaluation, and staff development, and that comply with all applicable statutory and regulatory requirements. Preschool programs for which federal reimbursement is not available shall be funded as prescribed by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, and unless otherwise specified by the Legislature, shall not use federal funds made available through Title XX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397).

(b) A part-day California state preschool program shall operate for a minimum of (1) three hours per day, excluding time for home-to-school transportation, and (2) a minimum of 175 days per year, unless the contract specifies a lower number of days of operation.

(c) A full-day California state preschool program shall operate for a minimum of 246 days per year, unless the contract specifies a lower number of days of operation.

(d) Any agency described in subdivision (a) of Section 8205 as an “applicant or contracting agency” is eligible to contract to operate a California state preschool program.

(e) Public funds shall not be paid directly or indirectly to an agency that does not pay at least the minimum wage to each of its employees.

(f) Federal Head Start funds used to provide services to families receiving California state preschool services shall be deemed nonrestricted funds.

(g) School districts and charter schools that administer a California
 state preschool program may place four-year-old children in a transitional kindergarten program classroom in accordance with subdivisions (h) to (j), inclusive, of Section 48000.

(h) California state preschool programs shall include all of the following:

(1) Age- and developmentally appropriate activities for children.

(2) Supervision.

(3) Parenting education and parent engagement.

(4) Social services that include, but are not limited to, identification of child and family needs and referral to appropriate agencies.

(5) Health services.

(6) Nutrition.

(7) Training and career ladder opportunities, documentation of which shall be provided to the department.

(i) The Superintendent shall adopt rules and regulations related to the administration of this chapter, including rules and regulations related to eligibility, enrollment, and priority of services. Regulations shall also include the recommendations of the State Department of Health Care Services relative to health care screening and the provision of health care services. The Superintendent shall seek the advice and assistance of these health authorities in situations where service under this chapter includes or requires care of children who are ill or have exceptional needs.

(j) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027,
 and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 3.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

8207.

(a) The Superintendent shall administer all California state preschool programs. Those programs shall include, but not be limited to, part-day and full-day age and developmentally appropriate programs, offered through childcare centers and family childcare home education networks, that are designed to facilitate the transition to kindergarten for three- and four-year-old children and that provide early learning and care, health services, social services, nutritional services, parent education and parent participation, evaluation, and staff development, and that comply with all applicable statutory and regulatory requirements. Preschool programs for which federal reimbursement is not available shall be funded as prescribed by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, and unless otherwise specified by the
 Legislature, shall not use federal funds made available through Title XX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397).

(b) A part-day California state preschool program shall operate for a minimum of (1) three hours per day, excluding time for home-to-school transportation, and (2) a minimum of 175 days per year, unless the contract specifies a lower number of days of operation.

(c) A full-day California state preschool program shall operate for a minimum of 246 days per year, unless the contract specifies a lower number of days of operation.

(d) Any agency described in subdivision (a) of Section 8205 as an “applicant or contracting agency” is eligible to contract to operate a California state preschool program.

(e) Public funds shall not be
 paid directly or indirectly to an agency that does not pay at least the minimum wage to each of its employees.

(f) Federal Head Start funds used to provide services to families receiving California state preschool services shall be deemed nonrestricted funds.

(g) School districts and charter schools that administer a California state preschool program may place four-year-old children in a transitional kindergarten program classroom in accordance with subdivisions (h) to (j), inclusive, of Section 48000.

(h) California state preschool programs shall include all of the following:

(1) Age- and developmentally appropriate activities for children.

(2) Supervision.

(3) Parenting education and parent engagement.

(4) Social services that include, but are not limited to, identification of child and family needs and referral to appropriate agencies.

(5) Health services.

(6) Nutrition.

(7) Training and career ladder opportunities, documentation of which shall be provided to the department.

(i) The Superintendent shall adopt rules and regulations related to the administration of this chapter, including rules and regulations related to eligibility, enrollment, and priority of services. Regulations shall also include the recommendations of the State Department of Health Care Services relative to
 health care screening and the provision of health care services. The Superintendent shall seek the advice and assistance of these health authorities in situations where service under this chapter includes or requires care of children who are ill or have exceptional needs.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 4.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8207.1.

(a) A California state preschool contractor operating a part-day, full-day, or both part- and full-day California state preschool program may, but is not required to, enroll interested eligible two-year-old children.

(b) The Superintendent, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall develop guidance for contractors to follow when enrolling two-year-old
 children, which shall include, but not be limited to, guidance for safe, age-appropriate diapering and toilet training in alignment with the requirements set forth in Division 12 (commencing with Section 101151) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, the department may, on or before April 1, 2025, implement this section and associated guidance on serving two-year-old children through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

8207.1.

(a) A contractor shall not serve any two-year-old children, as defined in Section 8205 as that section read on June 30, 2027, on or after July 1, 2027, unless the contractor was serving those two-year-old children before July 1, 2027. The adjustment factors and rates described in Section 8244 as that section read on June 30, 2027, shall still apply to those two-year-old children until they meet the definition of three-year-old children.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 6.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8208.

(a) (1) A child is eligible for the part-day California state preschool program if both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The child is one of the following:

(i) A two-year-old child and the California state preschool program has chosen to enroll the two-year-old child in accordance with the guidance developed pursuant to Section 8207.1.

(ii) A three-year-old child.

(iii) A four-year-old child.

(iv) Enrolled in kindergarten pursuant to Section 48000.

(B) The child’s family is one of the following:

(i) A current aid recipient.

(ii) Income eligible.

(iii) Homeless.

(iv) One whose children are recipients of child protective services, or whose children have been identified as being abused, neglected, or exploited, or at risk of being abused, neglected, or exploited.

(v) (I) One that has children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 8205.

(II) Only the children in the family who are children with exceptional needs may be enrolled under the eligibility criteria of this clause. Any other
 child in the family without exceptional needs may be enrolled pursuant to any of the criteria established in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.

(vi) One who has a member of its household who is certified to receive benefits from Medi-Cal, CalFresh, the California Food Assistance Program, the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the federal Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations, Head Start, Early Head Start, or any other designated means-tested government program, as determined by the department. Children eligible for services pursuant to this subparagraph shall be prioritized by the income declared on the application for the means-tested government program.

(vii) One whose parent or guardian is employed by a local educational agency.

(2) Notwithstanding any other
 law, a part-day California state preschool program may provide services to children in families whose income is no more than 15 percent above the income eligibility threshold, as described in Section 8213, after all eligible two-, three-, and four-year-old children have been enrolled. No more than 10 percent of children enrolled, calculated throughout the participating program’s entire contract, may be filled by children in families above the income eligibility threshold.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 8213, after all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2), a part-day California state preschool program may provide services to two-, three-, and four-year-old children in families whose income is above the income eligibility threshold if those children are children with exceptional needs. Children receiving services pursuant to this paragraph shall not count towards the 10-percent limit in paragraph
 (2).

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, after all otherwise eligible children have been enrolled as provided in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, a provider operating a part-day state preschool program within the attendance boundary of a public school or school district, as set forth in Section 8217, may enroll two-, three-, and four-year-old children.

(b) A part-day California state preschool program contracting agency shall certify eligibility and enroll families into their program within 120 calendar days prior to the first day of the beginning of the new preschool year. Subsequent to enrollment, a child shall be deemed eligible for a part-day California state preschool program for the remainder of the program year and for the following program year, as long as applicable age-eligibility requirements are met, as specified in Sections 8205 and 48000.

(c) (1) Commencing July 1, 2022, at least 5 percent of a part-day California state preschool program contracting agency’s funded enrollment shall be reserved for children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 8205.

(2) (A) The department shall review data on compliance and provide technical assistance to California state preschool program contracting agencies to assist them in meeting the requirement described in paragraph (1).

(B) (i) Agencies shall be fully funded for the percentage of enrollment specified in paragraph (1), inclusive of the exceptional needs adjustment factor for that enrollment pursuant to Section 8244, to ensure funding
 is available to enroll children with exceptional needs within the set aside specified in paragraph (1) at any point during the fiscal year. An agency not meeting the requirement to fill the percent of funded enrollment specified in paragraph (1) with children with exceptional needs shall conduct community outreach to special education partners to recruit additional children with exceptional needs into their programs.

(ii) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, any portion of funding provided under this paragraph that is not earned during the fiscal year shall not be retained by the agency and shall be subject to recovery by the department.

(C) (i) Any agency not meeting the applicable requirement described in clause (ii) may be put on a conditional
 contract as described in Section 8314 unless they have applied and been approved for a waiver pursuant to clause (iii).

(ii) On and after July 1, 2026, any agency not meeting the 5-percent requirement pursuant to paragraph (1).

(iii) The Superintendent shall create an ongoing waiver process for an agency not able to meet the requirement described in paragraph (1).

(3) Children with exceptional needs attending California state preschool programs shall be educated in the least restrictive environment in accordance with Section 1412(a)(5)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement this subdivision, the department shall implement this subdivision through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before December 31, 2022.

(B) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement this subdivision on or before December 31, 2023.

(d) (1) A child is eligible for a full-day California state preschool program if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The child is one of the following:

(i) A two-year-old child and the California state preschool program has chosen to enroll the two-year-old child in accordance with the guidance developed pursuant to Section
 8207.1.

(ii) A three-year-old child.

(iii) A four-year-old child.

(B) The child’s family is one of the following:

(i) A current aid recipient.

(ii) Income eligible.

(iii) Homeless.

(iv) One whose children are recipients of child protective services, or whose children have been identified as being abused, neglected, or exploited, or at risk of being abused, neglected, or exploited.

(v) (I) One that has children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 8205.

(II) Only the children in the family who are children with exceptional needs may be enrolled under the eligibility criteria of this clause. Any other child in the family without exceptional needs may be enrolled pursuant to any of the criteria established in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.

(vi) One who has a member of its household who is certified to receive benefits from Medi-Cal, CalFresh, the California Food Assistance Program, the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the federal Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations, Head Start, Early Head Start, or any other designated means-tested government program, as determined by the department. Children eligible for services pursuant to this subparagraph shall be prioritized by the income declared on the application for the means-tested government program.

(vii) One whose parent or guardian is employed by a local educational agency.

(C) The child’s family needs the childcare services because of either of the following:

(i) The child has been identified by a legal, medical, or social services agency, a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a Head Start program, or an emergency or transitional shelter as one of the following:

(I) A recipient of protective services.

(II) Being neglected, abused, or exploited, or at risk of neglect, abuse, or exploitation.

(III) Being
 homeless.

(ii) The child’s parents are one of the following:

(I) Engaged in vocational training leading directly to a recognized trade, paraprofession, or profession.
